Mississippi, session 2026, HB1854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the Mississippi Main Street Revitalization Grant Program Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of making grants under the Mississippi Main Street Revitalization Grant Program established under Sections 57-78-1 through 57-78-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, to certain Main Street Designated Communities for the projects described in Section 2 of this act, for the period beginning upon the passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027...................... $ 9,821,328.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be distributed by the Mississippi Development Authority as grants to the following Main Street Designated Communities for the projects described below: Community      Project Name                 Grant Amount Requested Amory          Amory Downtown District Revitalization Project                 $500,000.00 Biloxi         How Hop Creative Project               $500,000.00 Booneville     Booneville Historic Hardware Building Restoration                   $500,000.00 Cleveland      Town Green and Public Art Placement                              $120,000.00 Columbus       Downtown Columbus Wayfinding and Streetscape Improvement Project         $380,000.00 Crystal Springs        Old Biggs Building Revitalization Project                                $122,000.00 Greenville     Greater Greenville River City Revitalization Initiative              $500,000.00 Hattiesburg    Downtown Hattiesburg Welcome Center     $500,000.00 Hernando       Hernando Streetscapes, Public Space Improvements and Retail Recruitment     $180,000.00 Moss Point     Riverfront District Revitalization Project                                $500,000.00 Natchez        The Depot Park and Natchez Bluff        $362,000.00 Nettleton      Old Barber Shop Restoration             $130,000.00 New Albany     Revealing or Destination Safely         $330,000.00 Pascagoula     Flagship Revitalization Streetscape Plan                                   $500,000.00 Ripley         The Hills Hotel                        $500,000.00 Saltillo       Wayfinding and Street Sign Revitalization                         $410,000.00 Senatobia      Senatobia Utilities Building Renovation                             $400,000.00 Vicksburg      Blues Highway Travel Center             $408,000.00 Water Valley   Water Valley Historic Walking Tour      $130,000.00 Fondren Renaissance Foundation     Fondren Signature Streetscapes          $339,328.00 Greenwood- Leflore EDF    Whittington Building Revitalization     $500,000.00 Laurel         Downtown Brickyard Revitalization Project                                $500,000.00 McComb         A Focus on Safety in the Historic Downtown District                      $400,000.00 Meridian       Main Street Light Project              $200,000.00 Starkville     Starkville Streetscape Improvements     $500,000.00 Woodville      Odd Fellows Building                   $410,000.00 TOTAL $9,821,328.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the Mississippi Main Street Revitalization Grant Program Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.